Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-108
Attorney General; act as legal advisor.

The commission may consult the Attorney General with reference to any matter upon which it may require advice, and the Attorney General shall give such advice as the commission may require and perform such other services within the line of duty as the commission may require.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. I, § 8, p. 1357;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 30.